Massachusetts, session 194th, H1747.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 22 . Chapter 94C is hereby amended by inserting after section 34A the
following section:- Section 34B: Any person who, in good faith, reports a crime shall not be
charged or prosecuted for (i) possession of a controlled substance under section 34, (ii) sex for
fee under chapter 272 section 53A subsections (a) or (b), (iii) loitering under chapter 161 section
95, (iv) trespassing under chapter 266 section 120, (v) soliciting under chapter 272 section 8, or
(vi) conspiracy to commit any of the aforementioned offenses under chapter 94C section 40, or
found in violation of a condition of probation or pretrial release as determined by a court or a
condition of parole, as determined by the parole board if the evidence for the above enumerated
offenses was gained as a result of reporting a crime.
If the reporting victim or witness later withdraws their cooperation with law enforcement,
the victim or witness may not be charged under those sections of the laws cited above. It is not
of 2

necessary that a reported crime be prosecuted or result in a conviction in order for the protection
provided by this section to be applicable.
of 2